Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 1 DEFINITIONS
§ 49-110. Definitions — I.

“Identifying number” means:

Motor number. That identifying number stamped on the engine of a vehicle.

Vehicle identification number. The numbers and letters, if any, placed on a vehicle by the manufacturer for the purpose of identifying the vehicle.

“Implements of husbandry” means every vehicle including self-propelled units, designed or adapted and used exclusively in agricultural, horticultural, dairy and livestock growing and feeding operations. Such implements include, but are not limited to, combines, discs, dry and liquid fertilizer spreaders, cargo tanks, harrows, hay balers, harvesting and stacking equipment, pesticide applicators, plows, swathers, mint tubs and mint wagons, and farm wagons. A farm tractor when attached to or drawing any implement of husbandry shall be construed to be an implement of husbandry. “Implements of husbandry” do not include semitrailers, nor do they include motor vehicles or trailers, unless their design limits their use to agricultural, horticultural, dairy or livestock growing and feeding operations.

“Incidentally operated” means the transport of the implement of husbandry from one (1) farm operation to another.

“Individual record” means a record containing personal information about a designated person who is the subject of the record as identified in a request for information.

“Infraction” means a civil public offense, not constituting a crime, which is not punishable by incarceration and for which there is no right to a trial by jury or right to court-appointed counsel, and which is punishable by only a penalty not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300) and no imprisonment.

“Instruction permits”:

“Class A, B or C instruction permit.” (See “Commercial learner’s permit,” section 49-104, Idaho Code)

“Class D driver’s training instruction permit” means a temporary privilege to operate a class D motor vehicle while attending classes as an enrollee of a public or private driver’s training course only; is available to a person aged fourteen and one-half (14 ½) years and older; is issued to the instructor of the driver’s training course; is issued and expires pursuant to the provisions of section 49-307, Idaho Code; and the permittee is subject to the conditions specified in section 49-307, Idaho Code.

“Class D instruction permit” means a temporary privilege to operate a class D motor vehicle which is available to a person under the age of seventeen (17) years who has successfully completed an approved driver’s training course and has satisfied the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit, or to any person seventeen (17) years of age or older; is valid for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days or as provided in section 49-305, Idaho Code, if applicable; privileges are limited to driving with a person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age who holds a valid class D driver’s license and is actually occupying a seat beside the permittee; is issued pursuant to the provisions of section 49-305, Idaho Code; and the permittee is subject to the conditions specified in section 49-305, Idaho Code.

“Class D supervised instruction permit” means a temporary privilege to operate a class D motor vehicle which is available to a person who is at least fourteen and one-half (14 ½) years of age who has successfully completed an approved driver’s training course. No person may apply for a class D driver’s license until he has attained the age of at least fifteen (15) years and has successfully satisfied the requirements of this permit, as specified and issued pursuant to the provisions of section 49-307, Idaho Code.
(7) “Instructor” means any person, whether acting for himself as operator of a commercial driver training school or for such a school for compensation, who teaches, conducts classes of, gives demonstrations to, or supervises practice of, persons learning to operate or drive motor vehicles.

(8) “Insurer” means any insurer, public or private, which shall include, but not be limited to, insurance companies domiciled in the state of Idaho, agents, adjuster or any other person acting on behalf of any insurance not domiciled in the state of Idaho and any self-insured entity operating under Idaho insurance laws or rules.

(9) “International registration plan” means a registration reciprocity agreement among the states of the United States and provinces of Canada providing for payment of registration and licensing fees on a proportional basis determined by the fleet miles operated in the various jurisdictions.

(10) “Intersection” means:

(a) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2) highways which join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come in conflict.

(b) Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of the divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. In the event an intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of two (2) roadways of the highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection.

(c) The junction of an alley with a street or highway shall not constitute an intersection.

§ 49-111. Definitions — J.

“Judgment” means a decree which shall have become final by expiration without appeal by the time within which an appeal might have been perfected, or by final affirmation on appeal, rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction of any state or of the United States, upon a cause of action arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of any motor vehicle, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, or upon a cause of action on an agreement or settlement for damages.

“Jurisdiction” means and includes a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, a foreign country and a state or province of a foreign country.

§ 49-112. Definitions

K. [Reserved.]

§ 49-113. Definitions — L.

“Laned highway” means a highway which is divided into two (2) or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic.

“Lane of travel.” (See “Traffic lane”, section 49-121, Idaho Code)

“Legal owner” means any person notated as “lienholder” of a vehicle, the notation appearing on the title records of the department and on the respective certificate of title.

“License” or “license to operate a motor vehicle” means any driver’s license or any other license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under, or granted by, the laws of this state, including:

Any temporary license or instruction permit;

Any nonresident’s operating privilege;

Any special permit issued by the department.

“Licensing authority” as used in chapter 20 of this title with reference to Idaho, means the department.

“Lien” or “encumbrance” means every security interest in any vehicle other than security interests in vehicles held in inventory for sale.

“Lienholder” means a person holding a security interest in a vehicle.

“Light weight” or “unladen weight” means the scale weight of a vehicle equipped for operation, but without any cargo on it.

“Limit line” or “stop line” means a solid white line extending across a highway indicating the point behind which vehicles are required to stop, which must conform to the manual and specifications adopted by the board pursuant to section 49-201, Idaho Code.

“Local authorities” means every county, highway district, municipal and other local board or body having authority to enact regulations, resolution and/or ordinances relating to traffic on the highways, public rights-of-way and streets under their jurisdiction under the constitution and laws of this state.

§ 49-113a. Fees for duplicate registration stickers. [Repealed.]

§ 49-114. Definitions — M.

“Major component part” for vehicles means a rear or rear clip, frame or subframe, body or center, passenger area, cab, front or front end assembly or front clip or nose section or roof of passenger compartment. “Major component part” for vessels means a hull, bow, gunnel, stern or transom, or permanently attached propulsion unit.

“Manifest” means a form used for identifying the quantity, composition, origin, routing, waste or material identification code and destination of hazardous material or hazardous waste during any transportation within, through, or to any destination in this state.

“Manufactured home.” (See section 39-4105, Idaho Code)

“Manufacturer” means every person engaged in the business of constructing or assembling vehicles of a type required to be registered at an established place of business in this state. The term, for purposes of sections 49-1613 through 49-1615, 49-1617, 49-1622 and 49-1623, Idaho Code, shall include a distributor and other factory representatives.

“Manufacturer’s year designation” means the model year designated by the vehicle manufacturer, and not the year in which the vehicle is, in fact, manufactured.

“Maximum gross weight” means the scale weight of a vehicle, equipped for operation, to which shall be added the maximum load to be carried as declared by the owner in making application for registration. When a vehicle against which a registration fee is assessed is a combination of vehicles, the term “maximum gross weight” means the combined maximum gross weights of all vehicles in the combination.

“Metal tire.” (See “Tires,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

“Mileage” means actual distance that a vehicle has traveled.

“Moped” means a limited-speed motor-driven cycle having wheels less than twenty (20) inches in diameter and:

Motorized propulsion that is not capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour on level ground, whether two (2) or three (3) wheels are in contact with the ground during operation. If an internal combustion engine is used, the displacement shall not exceed fifty (50) cubic centimeters and the moped shall have a power drive system that functions directly or automatically without clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive system is engaged; or

Two (2) wheels or three (3) wheels with no pedals, which is powered solely by electrical energy, has an automatic transmission, a motor which produces less than two (2) gross brake horsepower, is capable of propelling the device at a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour on level ground and, as originally manufactured, meets federal motor vehicle safety standards for motor-driven cycles. A moped is not required to be titled and no motorcycle endorsement is required for its operator.

“Motorbike” means a vehicle as defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code. Such vehicle shall be titled and may be approved for motorcycle registration pursuant to section 49-402, Idaho Code, upon certification by the owner of the installation and use of conversion components that make the motorbike compliant with federal motor vehicle safety standards. A motorbike does not include an electric-assisted bicycle.
(11) “Motorcycle” means every motor vehicle having a seat or saddle for the use of the rider, designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground or designed to travel on two (2) wheels in contact with the ground which is modified by the addition of two (2) stabilizing wheels on the rear of the motor vehicle, that meets the federal motor vehicle safety standards as originally designed, and includes a converted motorbike, but does not include a motor-driven cycle, a motorbike, a tractor, an electric-assisted bicycle, or a moped.

A moped does not include an electric-assisted bicycle.

(12) “Motor carrier” means an individual, partnership, corporation or other legal entity engaged in the transportation by motor vehicle of persons or property in the furtherance of a business or for hire.

(13) “Motor-driven cycle” means a cycle with a motor that produces five (5) brake horsepower or less as originally manufactured that meets federal motor vehicle safety standards as originally designed, and does not include mopeds or electric-assisted bicycles. Such vehicle shall be titled and a motorcycle endorsement is required for its operation.

(14) “Motor home” means a vehicular unit designed to provide temporary living quarters, built into an integral part or permanently attached to a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis. The vehicle must contain permanently installed independent life support systems that meet the national fire protection association (NFPA) 1192 standard on recreational vehicles, and provide at least four (4) of the following facilities: cooking, refrigeration or icebox, self-contained toilet, heating and/or air conditioning, a potable water supply system, including a faucet and sink, separate 110-125 volt electrical power supply and/or LP-gas supply.

(15) “Motorized wheelchair” means a motor vehicle with a speed not in excess of eight (8) miles per hour, designed for and used by a person with a disability.

(16) “Motor number.” (See “Identifying number,” section 49-110, Idaho Code)

(17) “Motor vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

(18) “Motor vehicle liability policy” means an owner’s or operator’s policy of liability insurance, certified as provided in section 49-1210, Idaho Code, as proof of financial responsibility, and issued by an insurance carrier duly authorized to transact business in this state, to or for the benefit of the person named therein as insured.

(19) “Motor vehicle record” means any record that pertains to a motor vehicle registration, motor vehicle title or identification documents or other similar credentials issued by the department or other state or local agency.

(20) “Multiuse path” means a path physically separated from motor vehicle traffic by an open space or barrier and within either a public right-of-way or easement that accommodates two-way nonmotorized travelers including pedestrians, bicyclists, joggers, and skaters.

§ 49-115. Definitions — N.

“National network” means highways available to vehicles authorized by the provisions of the federal surface transportation assistance act of 1982 as amended, and listed in 23 CFR part 658, appendix A.

“Neighborhood electric vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

“Noncommercial vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

“Nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit” or “nondomiciled commercial driver’s license” means a commercial learner’s permit or a commercial driver’s license, respectively, issued by a state or other jurisdiction under either of the following conditions:

To an individual domiciled in a foreign country meeting the requirements of 49 CFR 383.23(b)(1); or

To an individual domiciled in another state meeting the requirements of 49 CFR 383.23(b)(2).

“Nonresident” means every person who is not a resident of this state.

“Nonresident’s operating privilege” means the privilege conferred upon a nonresident by the laws of this state pertaining to the operation by that person of a motor vehicle, or the use of a vehicle owned by that person, in this state.

§ 49-116. Definitions — O.

“Operator” means every person who is in actual physical control of a motor vehicle upon a highway or private property open to public use.

“Out of service order” means a temporary prohibition against operating a commercial vehicle as declared by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, Canadian, Mexican or local jurisdiction and which is applicable to a driver, a commercial motor vehicle or a motor carrier operation pursuant to federal regulations 49 CFR part [section] 386.72, 392.5, 395.13 or 396.9, or compatible laws, or to the North American uniform out-of-service criteria.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a vehicle. The term includes a person entitled to the use and possession of a vehicle subject to a security interest in another person, but excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security. “Owner” for the purposes of chapter 12[, title 49, Idaho Code,] means the person legally responsible for the operation of a vehicle upon the highways of the state of Idaho, whether as owner, lessee or otherwise.

§ 49-117. Definitions — P.

“Park” or “parking” means the standing of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, other than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in loading or unloading property or passengers.

“Park model recreational vehicle” means a recreational vehicle that is designed to provide temporary accommodations for recreational, camping or seasonal use, is built on a single chassis, was originally mounted on wheels, has a gross trailer area not exceeding four hundred (400) square feet in the set-up mode and is certified by its manufacturer as complying with the American National Standards Institute (ANSI) A119.5 Standard for Recreational Park Trailers, and includes park models, park trailers and recreational park trailers.

“Part-time salesman” means any person employed as a vehicle salesman on behalf of a dealer less than thirty (30) hours per week.

“Peace officer.” (See section 19-5101(d), Idaho Code)

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot and any person operating a wheelchair or a motorized wheelchair or an electric personal assistive mobility device.

“Pedestrian path” means any path, sidewalk or way set aside and used exclusively by pedestrians.

“Person” means every natural person, firm, fiduciary, copartnership, association, corporation, trustee, receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors, political subdivision, state or federal governmental department, agency, or instrumentality and, for the purposes of chapter 22, title 49, Idaho Code, shall include a private, common or contract carrier operating a vehicle on any highway of this state.
(7)(a) “Person” means every natural person, firm, fiduciary, copartnership, association, corporation, trustee, receiver or assignee for the benefit of creditors, political subdivision, state or federal governmental department, agency, or instrumentality and, for the purposes of chapter 22, title 49, Idaho Code, shall include a private, common or contract carrier operating a vehicle on any highway of this state.

“Person with a disability” means:

A person who is unable to walk two hundred (200) feet or more unassisted by another person;

A person who is unable to walk two hundred (200) feet or more without the aid of a walker, cane, crutches, braces, prosthetic device or a wheelchair; or

A person who is unable to walk two hundred (200) feet or more without great difficulty or discomfort due to the following impairments: neurological, orthopedic, respiratory, cardiac, arthritic disorder, blindness, or the loss of function or absence of a limb.

For the purposes of chapters 3 and 4, title 49, Idaho Code, a person with a permanent disability is one whose physician certifies that the person qualifies as a person with a disability pursuant to this paragraph and further certifies that there is no expectation for a fundamental or marked change in the person’s condition at any time in the future.

“Personal delivery device” means an electrically powered device that is operated on sidewalks and crosswalks and is intended primarily to transport property; weighs less than two hundred (200) pounds, excluding cargo; has a maximum speed of ten (10) miles per hour; and is equipped with technology to allow for operation of the device with or without the active control or monitoring of a natural person. A personal delivery device shall not be defined as a vehicle or motor vehicle in any section of the law, unless expressly so stated.

“Personal delivery device operator” means an entity or its agent that exercises direct physical control or monitoring over the navigation system and operation of a personal delivery device. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “agent” means a person charged by the entity with the responsibility of navigating and operating the personal delivery device. The term “personal delivery device operator” does not include an entity or person who requests the services of a personal delivery device for the purpose of transporting property or an entity, nor does it include a person who merely arranges for and dispatches the requested services of a personal delivery device.
(10) “Personal information” means information that identifies an individual, including an individual’s photograph or computerized image, social security number, driver identification number, name, address, telephone number, and medical or disability information, but does not include information on vehicular accidents, driving or equipment-related violations, the five-digit zip code of the person’s address, or status of the driver’s license or motor vehicle registration.

(11) “Pneumatic tire.” (See “Tires,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

(12) “Pole trailer.” (See “Trailer,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

(13) “Possessory lien” means a lien dependent upon possession for compensation to which a person is legally entitled for making repairs or performing labor upon, and furnishing supplies or materials for, and for the towing, storage, repair, or safekeeping of, any vehicle of a type subject to registration.

(14) “Possessory lienholder” means any person claiming a lien, which lien claimed to have accrued on a basis of services rendered to the vehicle that is the subject of the lien.

(15) “Preceding year” means, for the purposes of section 49-434, Idaho Code, a period of twelve (12) consecutive months fixed by the department, prior to July 1 of the year immediately preceding the commencement of the registration or license year for which proportional registration is sought. The department in fixing the period shall make it conform to the terms, conditions and requirements of any applicable agreement or arrangement for the proportional registration of vehicles.

(16) “Pressure regulator valve” means a device or system that governs the load distribution and controls the weight borne by a variable load suspension axle in accordance with a predetermined valve setting.

(17) “Principal place of business” means an enclosed commercial structure located within the state, easily accessible and open to the public at all reasonable times, with an improved display area large enough to display five (5) or more vehicles of the type the dealer is licensed to sell, immediately adjoining the building, and at which the business of a dealership, including the display and repair of vehicles, may be lawfully carried on in accordance with the terms of all applicable building codes, zoning and other land-use regulatory ordinances, and in which building the public shall be able to contact the dealer or his salesmen in person or by telephone at all reasonable times. The books, records and files necessary to conduct the business of the dealership must be kept or reproduced electronically at the dealership’s licensed location(s). A dealership keeping its physical books, records and files at an off-site location must notify the department in writing of such location at least thirty (30) days in advance of moving such books, records and files off site. Physical books, records and files must be made available to the department upon request within three (3) business days of such request. The principal place of business shall display an exterior sign permanently affixed to the land or building, with letters clearly visible to the major avenue of traffic. In no event shall a room or rooms in a hotel, rooming house, or apartment house building or a part of any single or multiple unit dwelling house be considered a “principal place of business” within the terms and provisions of this title unless the entire ground floor of that hotel, apartment house, or rooming house building or dwelling house be devoted principally to and occupied for commercial purposes, and the office or offices of the dealer be located on the ground floor.

(18) “Private property open to the public” means real property not owned by the federal government or the state of Idaho or any of its political subdivisions, but is available for vehicular traffic or parking by the general public with the permission of the owner or agent of the real property.

(19) “Private road” means every way or place in private ownership and used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner, but not by other persons.

(20) “Proof of financial responsibility” means proof of ability to respond in damages for liability, on account of accidents occurring subsequent to the effective date of the proof, arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, in the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) because of bodily injury to or death of one (1) person in any one (1) accident and, subject to the limit for one (1) person, in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) because of bodily injury to or death of two (2) or more persons in any one (1) accident, and in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) because of injury to or destruction of property of others in any one (1) accident.

(21) “Proper authority” means a public highway agency.

(22) “Public highway agency” means the state transportation department, any city, county, highway district or any other state agency that has jurisdiction over public highway systems and public rights-of-way.

(23) “Public right-of-way” means a right-of-way open to the public and under the jurisdiction of a public highway agency, where the public highway agency has no obligation to construct or maintain said right-of-way for vehicular traffic.

(24) “Public road jurisdiction” means a public highway agency.

(25) “Purchase.” (See “Sell,” “sold,” and “buy,” section 49-120, Idaho Code)

§ 49-118. Definitions

Q. [Reserved.]

§ 49-119. Definitions — R.

“Racing” means the use of one (1) or more vehicles in an attempt to outgain, outdistance, or prevent another vehicle from passing, to arrive at a given destination ahead of another vehicle, or to test the physical stamina or endurance of drivers over long-distance driving routes.

“Radio operator, amateur” means any person licensed by the Federal Communications Commission to engage in private and experimental two-way radio operation and holding a conditional class license or higher.

“Railroad” means a carrier of persons or property upon cars operated upon stationary rails.

“Railroad train” means a steam engine, electric or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails.

“Railroad sign” or “signal” means any sign, signal or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

“Recreational vehicle” means a motor home, travel trailer, fifth-wheel trailer, park model recreational vehicle, truck camper or folding camping trailer, with or without motive power, designed for recreational or emergency occupancy. It does not include pick-up hoods, shells, or canopies designed, created or modified for occupational usage. School buses or van type vehicles which are converted to recreational use, are defined as recreational vehicles.

“Registered maximum gross weight” means the maximum gross weight established on the registration document as declared by the owner at the time of registration or renewal of registration.

“Registered owner” means any person required to register a vehicle, whether or not a lienholder appears on the title in the records of the department.

“Registration” means the registration certificate or certificates and license plate or plates issued under the laws of this state pertaining to the registration of vehicles.

“Rental utility trailer” means a utility trailer offered for hire to the general public for private or commercial use.

“Rescission of sale.” (See section 28-2-608, Idaho Code)

“Resident” means for purposes of vehicle registration, titling, a driver’s license or an identification card, a person whose domicile has been within Idaho continuously for a period of at least ninety (90) days, excluding a full-time student who is a resident of another state. A person, including a full-time student who has established a domicile in Idaho may declare residency earlier than ninety (90) days for vehicle registration, titling, driver’s license and identification card purposes. Establishment of residency shall include a spouse and dependent children who reside with that person in the domicile. A domicile shall not be a person’s workplace, vacation or part-time residence.

“Residential district.” (See “District,” section 49-105, Idaho Code)

“Residential neighborhood” for purposes of this chapter, is an area abutting a highway which is used primarily for nontransient human habitation, parks and churches.

“Revocation of driver’s license” means the termination by formal action of the department or as otherwise provided in this title of a person’s driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the highways, which terminated driver’s license or privilege shall not be subject to renewal or restoration except that an application for a new driver’s license may be presented and acted upon by the department after the expiration of the applicable period of time prescribed in this title.
(16) “Revocation of vehicle registration” means the termination by formal action of the department or as otherwise provided in this title of a person’s vehicle registration or, in the case of fleets of vehicles, all vehicle registrations in each fleet operated by a company. Upon revocation, the privileges of operating the vehicles on Idaho highways is terminated until the difficulty that caused the revocation is corrected and an application for new registration is presented and acted upon.

(17) “Ridesharing arrangement” means the nonprofit transportation in a passenger motor vehicle with a seating capacity not exceeding fifteen (15) people including the driver, which is not otherwise used for commercial purposes or as a public conveyance, whereby a fixed group, not exceeding fifteen (15) people including passengers and driver, is transported between their residences or nearby termini, and their places of employment or educational or other institutions or termini near those places, in a single daily round trip where the driver is also on the way to or from his place of employment or education or other institution.

(18) “Right-of-way” means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under circumstances of direction, speed and proximity as to give rise to danger of collision unless one grants precedence to the other. The term shall not be interpreted to mean that a highway user is relieved from the duty to exercise reasonable care at all times and from doing everything to prevent an accident. Failure to yield right-of-way shall not be construed as negligence per se or as prima facie evidence of negligence.

(19) “Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of sidewalks, shoulders, berms and rights-of-way.

§ 49-120. Definitions — S.

“Saddlemount combination” means a combination of vehicles in which a truck or truck tractor tows one (1), two (2) or three (3) trucks or truck tractors, each connected by a saddle to the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in front of it. The saddle is a mechanism that connects the front axle of the towed vehicle to the frame or fifth wheel of the vehicle in front and functions like a fifth wheel kingpin connection. A smaller vehicle mounted completely on the frame of either the first or last vehicle may be used in a saddlemount combination.

“Safety glazing materials” means glazing materials so constructed, treated or combined with other materials as to reduce substantially, in comparison with ordinary sheet glass or plate glass, the likelihood of injury to persons by objects from exterior sources or by these safety glazing materials when they may be cracked or broken.

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set apart within a highway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone.

“Salvage pool” means a licensed vehicle dealer engaged primarily in the business of disposing of salvage vehicles, recovered stolen vehicles, or both.

“School bus” means every motor vehicle that complies with the color and identification requirements set forth in the most recent edition of “Minimum Standards for School Buses” and is used to transport children to or from school or in connection with school approved activities and includes buses operated by contract carriers.

“Secretary” means the secretary of transportation of the United States.

“Security agreement.” (See section 28-9-102, Idaho Code)

“Security interest.” (See section 28-1-201, Idaho Code)

“Sell,” “sold,” “buy,” and “purchase,” mean and include, as used in sections 49-2401 through 49-2406, Idaho Code, exchange, barter, gift, and offer or contract to sell or buy.

“Semitrailer.” (See “Trailer,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

“Serious traffic violation” means conviction of an offense specified in 49 CFR part 383 and including any subsequent amendments thereto, while operating a commercial motor vehicle, and shall include driving a commercial motor vehicle:

Without obtaining a commercial driver’s license; or

Without having a commercial driver’s license in the driver’s possession; or

Without the proper license class of commercial driver’s license or endorsements for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported.

“Sidewalk” means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines intended for use by pedestrians.

“Signal.” (See “Railroad sign,” section 49-119, Idaho Code)

“Skills test” means an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle.

“Slow moving vehicle” means any vehicle not normally operated upon the highways.
(16) “Snow tire.” (See “Tires,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

(17) “Sold.” (See “Sell,” “buy,” and “purchase,” this section)

(18) “Solid rubber tire.” (See “Tires,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

(19) “Special license plate” means a license plate that is made available to the public as a personal alternative to the standard issue license plate. No special program fee shall be charged for the registration or plates issued under sections 49-403, 49-403A, 49-404, 49-405, 49-410, 49-415, 49-415A and 49-415B, Idaho Code.

(20) “Special mobile equipment” means every vehicle not designed or used primarily for the transportation of persons or property and only incidentally operated or moved over a highway, including: ditch-digging apparatus, well-boring apparatus and road construction and maintenance machinery such as asphalt spreaders, bituminous mixers, bucket loaders, tractors other than truck tractors, ditchers, leveling graders, finishing machines, motor graders, road rollers, scarifiers, earth moving carry-alls and scrapers, power shovels and drag lines, and self-propelled cranes, and earth moving equipment. The term does not include travel trailers, dump trucks, truck mounted transit mixers, cranes or shovels, or other vehicles designed for the transportation of persons or property to which machinery has been attached.

(21) “Specially constructed vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

(22) “Specialty off-highway vehicle.” (See “Vehicle,” section 49-123, Idaho Code)

(23) “Stand” or “standing” means the halting of a vehicle, whether occupied or not, otherwise than temporarily for the purpose of and while actually engaged in receiving or discharging passengers.

(24) “State” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico or a province of Canada.

(25) “Stop” means the act of or complete cessation from movement.

(26) “Stopping” means the act of any halting even momentarily of a vehicle.

(27) “Street.” (See “Highways,” section 49-109, Idaho Code)

(28) “Street rod” means any pre-1949 vehicle which has had a significant drive train update from a more modern vehicle. Changes may include engine, transmission, rear axle, and other suspension components. The body will be, or resemble the same as the manufacturer’s original issue after its first sale after manufacture.

(29) “Studded tire.” (See “Tires,” section 49-121, Idaho Code)

(30) “Substandard width lane” means a lane that is too narrow for a bicycle and a motor vehicle to travel safely side by side within the lane.

(31) “Supplemental lot” means a physically separate location owned and maintained by a licensed dealer or manufacturer within the same or adjacent county as the principal place of business which meets all the requirements for a principal place of business.

(32) “Suspension of driver’s license” means the temporary withdrawal by formal action of the department or as otherwise provided in this title of a person’s driver’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the public highways, which temporary withdrawal shall be for a period specifically designated by the department.